Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1707
Construction manager-general contractor contract, defined.

Construction manager-general contractor contract means a contract which is subject to a qualification-based selection process between the commission and a construction manager to furnish preconstruction services during the design development phase of the project and, if an agreement can be reached which is satisfactory to the commission, construction services for the construction phase of the project.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 8.